Utah statutes.
70D-3-301.   Prelicensing education.

(1)  Before an individual may be licensed under this chapter, the individual shall complete the number of hours of prelicensing education required by rule made by the commissioner.

(2) (a)  The commissioner shall make the rules described in Subsection (1):

(i)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(ii)  subject to the requirements of this Subsection (2).

(b)  The rules described in Subsection (1) shall require that an individual complete:

(i)  at least 20 hours of prelicensing education approved by the nationwide database; and

(ii)  as part of the 20 hours required by Subsection (2)(b)(i):

(A)  3 hours of federal law and regulations;

(B)  3 hours of ethics that include instruction on:

(I)  fraud;

(II)  consumer protection; and

(III)  fair lending issues; and

(C)  2 hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

